South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3503.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 2, Chapter 96, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 44-96-295. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the department is prohibited from issuing a permit for construction of any solid waste management facility including, but not limited to, a landfill, a municipal solid waste landfill, a sanitary landfill, or a solid waste disposal facility, pursuant to this article on land located within two miles of any park, preserve, green space, or other protected natural area owned or managed by the United States, the State, a county, a municipality, another political subdivision, or any other public entity. SECTION 2.  Chapter 20, Title 48 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 48-20-45.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the department is prohibited from issuing a certificate of exploration, general mining permit, operating permit, or any other certificate or permit pursuant to this chapter for exploration or mining activities on affected land located within two miles of any park, preserve, green space, or other protected natural area owned or managed by the United States, the State, a county, a municipality, another political subdivision, or any other public entity. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----